Louisiana, session 2026, SB140.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 2813 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
8 Art. 2813. Multiple successions in the same proceeding
9 The same proceeding may be used to open the successions of more than
10 one deceased person regardless of the dates of death of the deceased persons,
11 provided that the court has jurisdiction over each succession pursuant to Article
12 2811.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.